Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 9 Sale of State Lands

Statement of principle. —

Laws 1997, ch. 200, § 3, provides:

“(a)

The legislature endorses the following statements of principle and directs that the board of land commissioners and the director of state lands abide by these statements in the implementation of these statutes:

“(i)

The state land trust, consisting of trust lands, trust minerals and permanent land funds shall be managed under a total asset management policy;

“(ii)

The state land trust is intergenerational. Therefore, the focus is on protecting the corpus for the long term;

“(iii)

Trust land should remain a substantial, integral component of the state land trust portfolio. There is no mandate to sell any trust asset to maximize revenue in the short term;

“(iv)

All leases of trust land shall assure a return of at least fair market value considering the management practices and risk assumed by the lessee when determining fair market value;

“(v)

Investment policies shall ensure that the earning power of the permanent land fund is not reduced from the effect of inflation.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Lands §§ 40 to 67; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 64 to 68.

73B C.J.S. Public Lands §§ 178 to 199.

§ 36-9-101.
Authority; restrictions.

The board of land commissioners may at any time direct the sale of state lands subject to any lease thereof. Subject to criteria established by the board, any person may request that a parcel of state land be considered for sale by the board, but such lands shall only be nominated for sale by a majority vote of the board. Such lands which have been reserved in any way to the public use, or for the use of public institutions, shall not be sold to any member of the board. The board shall sell such lands according to the subdivisions of sections as established by the United States survey thereof, or by metes and bounds, as may appear to be to the interest of the state of Wyoming. The board shall sell such subdivisions as it shall deem for the best interests of the state land trust. The board shall not sell state land unless the board finds that the proceeds from the sale are protected from inflationary effects and the proceeds will earn a significantly higher rate of return than can be realized through retention of the surface estate and if the board finds that the sale will:

Make state lands more manageable where the lands are not otherwise manageable;

Meet a specific need of a school or community for land;

Better meet multiple use objectives of the beneficiaries of the trust; or

Realize a clear long term benefit to the trust which substantially exceeds the present and probable future benefit from continued ownership.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 27; 1895, ch. 120, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 819; Laws 1907, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 627; C.S. 1920, § 722; Laws 1929, ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-501; Laws 1945, ch. 32, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-501; W.S. 1957, § 36-181; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Reservation of mineral rights. —

It being legislative policy to reserve to state right to execute leases for extraction of petroleum and other minerals, the board can make same reservation in contract for sale of agricultural or grazing lands. State ex rel. Cross v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 50 Wyo. 181, 58 P.2d 423,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1936).

Under existing statutes board was authorized to sell surface rights first, reserving minerals by requirement that purchaser convey mineral rights to state. State ex rel. Cross v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 50 Wyo. 181, 58 P.2d 423,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1936).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

§ 36-9-102.
Manner of sale; minimum price.

All state lands shall be disposed of only at public auction to the highest responsible bidder after having been duly appraised by the board, and shall be sold at not less than the appraised value thereof, and for not less than ten dollars ($10.00) per acre.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 29; R.S. 1899, § 821; C.S. 1910, § 629; C.S. 1920, § 724; R.S. 1931, § 91-503; C.S. 1945, § 24-502; W.S. 1957, § 36-182; Laws 1961, ch. 229, § 1; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

§ 36-9-103.
Appraisers for improvements.

All improvements upon state lands, when such lands are to be sold as provided by W.S.

36-9-102

, shall be appraised by three (3) disinterested persons who shall appraise the improvements separately from the lands, though they may be attached thereto. The said appraisers shall upon application of the state land board, be appointed by a judge of the district court of the judicial district wherein the lands are situate.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 229, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-182.1.

State land board. —

The reference to the “state land board” in the second sentence apparently means the board of land commissioners.

§ 36-9-104.
Advertisement.

All sales of state lands under this act shall be advertised for four (4) consecutive weeks in some newspaper in the county in which such land is situated, if there be such paper; if not, then in some paper published in an adjoining county. Advertisements of such sales may be made in other papers, as the board may direct. The advertisement shall state the time, place, description of land, and terms of sale, and the price at which the land was appraised by the board for each parcel.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 31; R.S. 1899, § 823; C.S. 1910, § 631; C.S. 1920, § 726; R.S. 1931, § 91-504; C.S. 1945, § 24-503; W.S. 1957, § 36-183.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice of selection of public lands prior to lease or sale, see §

36-3-104

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 36-1-101(a)(viii).

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 24.

§ 36-9-105.
Purchaser to pay owner appraised value of improvements; receipt.

If any state lands are sold upon which surface improvements, including irrigation works of any kind, have been made by a lessee, or for which water rights or proportionate interests in irrigation, reservoirs, canals, or systems, have been acquired, the improvements, irrigation works and water rights shall be appraised under the direction of the board. The purchaser of the lands, upon which improvements and irrigation works have been made, or for which water rights have been acquired as herein provided for, shall pay the owner of such improvements, irrigation works or water rights, as the case may be, the contributory value thereof, and take a receipt therefor, and shall deliver the receipt to the director before he shall receive a patent or certificate of purchase. All such receipts shall be filed and preserved in the office of state lands and investments. For purposes of this section, “contributory value” means the increased value of the property after the lessee’s improvements are considered.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 32; R.S. 1899, § 824; Laws 1909, ch. 132, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 632; C.S. 1920, § 727; R.S. 1931, § 91-505; C.S. 1945, § 24-504; W.S. 1957, § 36-184; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to improvements made by lessee, see §

36-5-110

.

As to sale or lease of mineral lands with improvements, see §

36-6-104

.

Policy objective of section. —

This section, as well as other related sections, has a sound policy objective of encouraging lessees to advance the permanent improvement and value of state lands by the investment of their own labor and money. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Water right is property right

of high order, with none of the characteristics of personal property, and it is real property. King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Requirements for conveyance of water right. —

To transfer or convey an interest in real estate the subject matter must be identified and the conveyance must clearly indicate intention to convey specific property and describe it. This rule is applicable to a conveyance of a water right. King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Board may construe conveyance. —

To determine whether it was the assignor's intention to convey a water right it was proper and necessary for the board to construe the conveyance. King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Water rights not conveyable where state is fee owner. —

Appurtenant water rights may not be conveyed or devised separately or in derogation of the rights of the state where at all times the state has been the owner in fee of the land in question. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Water right follows freehold interest.

King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Assignment of leasehold does not result in conveyance of freehold.—

Where the freehold interest in the lands to which the contested water rights were appurtenant was in the state, an assignment of a leasehold interest for a term of years could not have resulted in a conveyance of a larger estate. Although a leasehold be an interest in real estate it is not that of a freehold. King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Assignee was not the owner of water rights,

since the assignment standing alone cannot be considered to have severed and conveyed water rights. Not being the owner, he is not such person contemplated in this section as being entitled to receive reimbursement for the appraised value of the water rights. King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972).

Payment to lessee for water rights. —

The purchaser has to pay a lessee who acquires water rights during the term of his lease for the appraised value of these rights. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

Payment to prior lessee, not state. —

The purchaser of school land from the state must, as provided by this section, pay prior lessee thereof the appraised value of irrigation ditches made thereon and water rights acquired by him therefor, and not the state. State ex rel. Marble v. Carey, 26 Wyo. 300, 183 P. 785,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1919), limited, King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972), limited, White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 36-9-106.
Place of sale; execution of leases.

All sales of state lands shall be held at a location to be determined by the board within the county in which the land is located and leases for state lands may be executed in the presence of a notarial officer or other officer authorized to administer oaths.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 33; 1897, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 825; C.S. 1910, § 633; C.S. 1920, § 728; R.S. 1931, § 91-506; C.S. 1945, § 24-505; W.S. 1957, § 36-185; Laws 2003, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “justice of the peace” following “presence of a notary public”; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public.”

§ 36-9-107.
Terms of payment.

The terms of payment for school and state lands shall be as follows: not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the purchase price in cash on day of sale, the balance is not to exceed thirty (30) equal annual payments figured on the amortization plan, which shall include interest on the deferred part of the payments at a rate of interest established by the board in accordance with current interests rates. The interest rate on all amounts not paid when due shall be established by the board in accordance with current lending practices. The purchaser may pay in full at the time of the sale or payment of any installment may be made at any time if accrued interest is paid to the time of payment.

When school or state lands are sold under an installment contract the state shall insert a provision that the vendee shall pay the taxes upon the fair value of the lands sold from the date of the contract. The provision is binding upon the vendee. The installment contract shall be recorded in the county wherein the lands are situated by the vendee within thirty (30) days following its execution.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 34; R.S. 1899, § 826; C.S. 1910, § 634; Laws 1911, ch. 25, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 729; Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 91-507; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 1; 1937, ch. 56, § 1; 1939, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-506; W.S. 1957, § 36-186; Laws 1961, ch. 154, § 1; 1969, ch. 179, § 1; 1977, ch. 45, § 2; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Tax sales. —

Where purchaser enters under a contract of purchase, the state retaining title as security, only purchaser's interest may be assessed and sold for taxes, since state's interest is exempt from taxation and sale of property for delinquent taxes might destroy state's interest and thus violate constitutional provision fixing minimum price for sale of state lands. Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1914).

Quoted

in

Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

§ 36-9-108.
“Amortization plan” defined.

The amortization plan is hereby defined, when applied to state land contracts or certificates, as being that plan under which part of the principal is required to be paid each time interest becomes due and payable, and under which this part payment on the principal increases at each succeeding installment in the same amount that the interest payment decreases, so that the combined amount due on principal and interest on each due date remains the same until the loan is paid in full.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 91-508; C. S. 1945, § 24-507; W.S. 1957, § 36-187.

Quoted

in

Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

§ 36-9-109.
Certificate of purchase; issuance and contents.

When any state land shall have been purchased according to law, the board shall make and deliver to the purchaser a certificate of purchase, which shall contain the name of the purchaser, a description of the land purchased, the sum paid, the sum remaining unpaid, the amount of annual payments, which shall include the accrued interest, upon the amortization plan as hereinbefore defined, and the date on which each of the deferred payments falls due. All annual payments shall be due and payable on the first day of December of each year, provided that interest is paid on the full amount of the deferred payments at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum from date of the sale to the first day of December following such date of sale.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 35; R.S. 1899, § 829; C.S. 1910, § 637; C.S. 1920, § 733; Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 91-511; C.S. 1945, § 24-508; W.S. 1957, § 36-188.

Quoted

in

Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

Cited

in

Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1914).

§ 36-9-110.
Certificate of purchase; conversion of outstanding certificates; fee.

Any certificate of purchase of state or school land issued and outstanding when this act [§§

36-9-107

through

36-9-110

] takes effect may be converted into an amortization certificate on the plan set forth in this act at the request of the holder of said certificate of purchase, and with the consent of the state board of land commissioners; provided, however, that any certificate holder converting said certificate as herein provided shall pay interest on future payments at the rate of four and one-quarter percent (4 1/4%) per annum and six percent (6%) per annum on all amounts not paid when due.

The director shall collect in addition to the fees provided by law the sum of two dollars ($2.00) to be used by him for expenses incidental with transfers as made optional by this act for supplies, extra clerk hire, etc., and any unused portion of same shall be paid to the state treasurer at such time as all transfers have been made.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 91-512; C.S. 1945, § 24-509; W.S. 1957, § 36-189; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 7, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 25, 1925.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(vii).

Severability. —

Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 6, reads: “Should any section or provision of this act be decided by the court to be unconstitutional or invalid the same shall not affect the validity of the act as a whole or any part thereof other than the part as decided to be unconstitutional.”

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1925, ch. 91, § 5, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 36-9-111.
Certificate of purchase; loss or wrongful detention.

Whenever a certificate of purchase shall be lost, or wrongfully withheld from the owner thereof, the board may receive evidence of such loss or wrongful detention, and upon satisfactory proof of this fact, and such indemnity therefor as the board may prescribe, it may cause a new certificate of purchase or patent, as the case may be, to be issued to such person as shall appear to it to be the proprietor of the land described in the original certificate of purchase.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 43; R.S. 1899, § 836; C.S. 1910, § 644; C.S. 1920, § 740; R.S. 1931, § 91-518; C.S. 1945, § 24-515; W.S. 1957, § 36-190.

§ 36-9-112.
Granting of patents; reservation of minerals.

Whenever the purchaser of any state land, or his assign, has complied with all the conditions of this act and has paid all the purchase money therefor, together with the lawful interest thereon, he shall receive a patent for the land purchased. Such patent shall run in the name of the state of Wyoming, it shall be signed by the governor, and countersigned by the director, and attested by the seal of the board. Such patent signed and executed as aforesaid shall convey a good and sufficient title to the patentee therein named. A fee interest in any state land may be perfected only as herein provided and only by express grant by the state of Wyoming for that purpose.

Patents issued by the state of Wyoming shall contain a reservation to the state of all the minerals, whether or not now known, or which may be discovered hereafter, together with the right of ingress and egress to prospect for, mine, and remove such minerals. The board of land commissioners is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the exchange of mineral rights on a value for value basis. The exchange program may authorize a cash equalization receipt or payment of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of the mineral rights. Any receipt shall be deposited into, and any payment shall be made from, the permanent land fund.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 36; R.S. 1899, § 830; C.S. 1910, § 638; C.S. 1920, § 734; R.S. 1931, § 91-513; C.S. 1945, § 24-510; W.S. 1957, § 36-191; Laws 1971, ch. 176, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(vii).

Mandamus cannot compel issuance of patent. —

Where certificate of sale of state lands provided that before patent should issue, purchaser must convey to the state all mineral and mining rights, mandamus would not issue to compel issuance of patent until such reconveyance of mineral and mining rights was made. Word “land” used in statute does not refer only to land as having an indefinite extent upwards and downwards so as to prevent sale of surface rights only; statute providing for conveyance of title in fee simple does not establish that title in fee simple cannot exist to the surface rights separate from the mineral and mining rights. State ex rel. Cross v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 50 Wyo. 181, 58 P.2d 423,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1936).

Quoted

in

Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

Cited

in

Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1914).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

§ 36-9-113.
Deposition of moneys.

All moneys arising from the sale or lease of state lands as collected shall be paid by the board to the treasurer of the state, who shall receipt for the money.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 38; R.S. 1899, § 832; C.S. 1910, § 640; C.S. 1920, § 736; R.S. 1931, § 91-515; C.S. 1945, § 24-512; W.S. 1957, § 36-193; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2.

Trustee appointed by court. —

Under a bequest to the state creating a trust for certain annuitants, the state could not act as trustee for the purpose of paying the annuities, and the appointment of a trustee by a court of equity was affirmed. State v. Underwood, 54 Wyo. 1, 86 P.2d 707,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1939).

§ 36-9-114.
Refund of money when paid by mistake.

In case any person, persons or corporation shall pay to the board of land commissioners any money for any state or school lands sold to him, or them, or in case any person shall pay into the state treasury, any money in consideration of the leasing of lands, which said board supposed to belong to the state, and it shall thereafter be discovered that such lands do not belong to the state, and were not subject to sale by the state, as state or school lands, such money, together with interest — except in the case of money paid for leases — at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the date of the patent for such lands, but without interest if they have not been patented, shall be refunded to the person buying the same, upon certificate from the board of land commissioners to the effect that such money has been paid under mistake as aforesaid, such certificate being accompanied by a verified statement of account thereof, as in the case of other claims against the state; and upon the presentation of such certificate to the state auditor he shall draw his warrant upon the state treasurer for the amount named in such certificate, if the same is within the limit of any appropriation of money for said purpose. And it is hereby made the duty of said board to furnish such certificates upon ascertaining the fact of the mistake having been made.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 34, § 1; 1899, ch. 90, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 827; C.S. 1910, § 635; C.S. 1920, § 730; R.S. 1931, § 91-509; C.S. 1945, § 24-522; W.S. 1957, § 36-197.

Editor's notes. —

This section appears herein as drafted by the 1899 compilers and reprinted by all subsequent compilers. Laws 1899, ch. 90, did not amend Laws 1897, ch. 34, although the acts pertain to the same subject. The 1899 compilers combined the substance of the first sections of each of the acts.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1897, ch. 34, § 4, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 36-9-115.
Determination of claims; rules and regulations against fraud.

The board of land commissioners may hear and determine the claims of each person who may claim to be entitled, in whole or in part, to any lands owned by this state. The decisions of the board shall be final until set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction. The board may establish such rules and regulations as in its opinion may be proper to prevent fraudulent applications being granted.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 44; R.S. 1899, § 837; C.S. 1910, § 645; C.S. 1920, § 741; R.S. 1931, § 91-519; C.S. 1945, § 24-516; W.S. 1957, § 36-199.

Assumption by court. —

In mandamus proceedings to compel board to cancel a lease of state lands on the ground of having been procured by the lessee for the benefit of another, the court must assume that in passing on the lessee's application for the land the board decided such was not the fact. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Trial on appeal

includes determination of issues of fact made by pleadings, independent of the findings and determination of those issues by the board, whether such trial be had upon evidence submitted to the board or upon new evidence. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

When lease required to be cancelled. —

In contest proceeding seeking cancellation of state land lease upon proof submitted, the board acts in judicial capacity and is not required to cancel lease unless damage to state is shown, such as where contestant had no application before the board to purchase or lease land at time lease sought to be cancelled was granted. Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 36-9-116.
Trespass.

Any person who shall use or who shall occupy any state land without lease or certificate of purchase, and any person who shall use or occupy state lands for more than thirty (30) days after the cancellation or expiration of his lease, unless he shall be a purchaser thereof, shall be a trespasser; and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), and the bondsmen of such lessee shall, upon the bond of such lessee, be equally liable with the lessee for the payment of such fine imposed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 45; R.S. 1899, § 838; C.S. 1910, § 646; C.S. 1920, § 742; R.S. 1931, § 91-520; C.S. 1945, § 24-517; W.S. 1957, § 36-200.

Cross references. —

As to criminal trespass, see §

6-3-303

.

Cited

in

Cooper v. McCormick, 10 Wyo. 379, 69 P. 301,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1902).

§ 36-9-117.
Institution of actions.

All civil suits or actions brought under the provisions of this act shall be instituted by the board, in the name of the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 46; R.S. 1899, § 839; C.S. 1910, § 647; C.S. 1920, § 743; R.S. 1931, § 91-521; C.S. 1945, § 24-518; W.S. 1957, § 36-201; Laws 2006, ch. 95, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “civil.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(vii).

Library references. —

For article, “Partners in Pursuit of Polluters,” see 18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 24.

§ 36-9-118.
Rights-of-way for public conveyances.

The board may, at their discretion, grant permanent rights-of-way or easements across or upon any portion of state or school lands, upon such terms as the board may determine, for any ditch, reservoir, railroad, public highway, telegraph and telephone lines, communications company facility or other public conveyances. As used in this section, “communications company” means as defined in W.S.

1-26-813

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 48; R.S. 1899, § 841; C.S. 1910, § 649; Laws 1915, ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 745; R.S. 1931, § 91-523; C.S. 1945, § 24-520; W.S. 1957, § 36-202; 2019 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to rights-of-way of United States across state lands, see §

36-10-105

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “board” for “board of land commissioners,” added “communications company facility” following “telegraph and telephone lines,” and added the last sentence.

State may grant rights-of-way across university lands.

Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Wyoming Board of Land Commissioners had discretion to grant easement. —

Trial court properly dismissed assignees'
action against defendants for a declaration that an easement was void, since the Wyoming Board of Land Commissioners clearly had discretionary authority to grant public easements over state lands.
Bentley v. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs., 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2007).

Stated

in

McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

§ 36-9-119.
Rights of ditch owners.

Nothing in this act shall be construed so as to impair the rights of any ditch company, or any person owning any ditch or ditches, on or passing through any of the lands included herein.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 79, § 49; R.S. 1899, § 842; C.S. 1910, § 650; C.S. 1920, § 747; R.S. 1931, § 91-525; C.S. 1945, § 24-521; W.S. 1957, § 36-203.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-1-101(a)(vii).

§ 36-9-120.
Rights-of-way to counties.

Upon application of the board of county commissioners of any county, the board of land commissioners shall have authority to grant either a temporary or permanent right-of-way for ditches owned by the county or for county roads over and across any of the state or school lands, upon such terms as said board may determine, and to issue to such county a certificate therefor; no charge shall be exacted for the filing of such application or for the issuance of such certificate or for granting and recording a right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 10, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 746; R.S. 1931, § 91-524; C.S. 1945, § 24-524; W.S. 1957, § 36-204.

County acquires for state. —

County acquiring easement over state land for road acquires it for state. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).